Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-505
Audiology or speech-language pathology assistant, defined.

Audiology or speech-language pathology assistant or any individual who presents himself or herself to the public by any title or description with the same duties means any person who, following specified training and receiving specified supervision, provides specified limited structured communication or swallowing services, which are developed and supervised by a licensed audiologist or licensed speech-language pathologist, in the areas in which the supervisor holds licenses.

Laws 2007, LB247, § 65;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 191.